Utah statutes.
39-6-72.   Fraudulent enlistment, appointment, or separation.

A person shall be punished as a military court directs, who:

(1)  procures his own enlistment or appointment in the National Guard by knowingly false representation or deliberate concealment as to his qualifications for that enlistment or appointment and receives pay or allowances thereunder; or

(2)  procures his own separation from the National Guard by knowingly false representation or deliberate concealment as to his eligibility for that separation.

